Nebraska, session 109, LB775.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB775 LB775
2026 2026
Section 1. (1) The Rural Health Transformation Program is created.
The purposes of the program are to: (a) Improve health care access,
quality, and outcomes by transforming the health care delivery ecosystem;
(b) support rural health innovations and new access points to promote
preventative health and address root causes of diseases; (c) help rural
providers become long-term access points for care by improving efficiency
and sustainability; (d) attract and retain a high-skilled health care
workforce by strengthening recruitment and retention of health care
providers in rural communities; (e) grow innovative care models to
improve health outcomes, coordinate care, and promote flexible care
arrangements; and (f) foster use of innovative technologies that promote
efficient care delivery, data security, and access to digital health
tools by rural facilities, providers, and patients.
(2) It is the intent of the Legislature to appropriate XXX in
federal funds received from the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid
Services to the Department of Health and Human Services for the purposes
of the Rural Health Transformation Program, which shall only be used for
such purpose.
-2-